Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1001
Act, how cited.

Sections 87-1001 to 87-1005 shall be known and may be cited as the Online Age Verification Liability Act.

Laws 2024, LB1092, § 1.
July 19, 2024